Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8008
Department of Health and Human Services; rules and regulations.

The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to implement the Certified Industrial Hygienist Title Protection Act and to further regulate the use of the term certified industrial hygienist.

Laws 1997, LB 558, § 8;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 687.